Utah statutes.
65A-8-103.   Forestry and fire control funds.

(1)  The division shall use monies available to it to meet the costs of:

(a)  controlling forest, range, and watershed fires;

(b)  controlling insect and disease epidemics;

(c)  rehabilitating or reforesting nonfederal forest, range, and watershed lands; and

(d)  carrying on the purposes of this chapter.

(2)  All monies available to the division to meet the costs of Subsections (1)(a) through (d) are nonlapsing and available to the division until expended.

(3) (a)  The collection and disbursement of all money made available to the division shall be in accordance with the rules of the Division of Finance.

(b)  Monies collected by the division from fees, rentals, sales, contributions, reimbursements, and other such sources shall be deposited in the appropriate account.

